Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,329
Battery Stewardship Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Battery Stewardship Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of fees collected under section 81-15,317. The fund shall be administered by the department and shall only be used for purposes of carrying out the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.